Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 466 of Title 74, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma State Data Center,
which shall be subject to the administrative direction of the
Legislative Service Bureau. The Oklahoma State Data Center shall be
the primary center for applied population research for the State of
Oklahoma, the official contact with the United States Census Bureau,
and the originator and official conductor of all special censuses
for the State of Oklahoma.
B. The responsibilities of the State Data Center are:

ENGR. H. B. NO. 3621 Page 1

1. To prepare, maintain, and interpret population statistics,
estimates, and projections, including distributions of the state's
population into political subdivisions, ethnic groups, and racial
populations;
2. To cooperate with and give assistance to other state
agencies and organizations in the preparation, maintenance, and
interpretation of demographic information;
3. To prepare an annual report on the state of the state's
population for submission to the Governor and the Legislature, with
some policy implications of the state's population trends;
4. To provide technical assistance to the Legislature for
purposes of reapportionment and redistricting districts, wards, and
other electoral divisions of the state and its political
subdivisions;
5. To assist the Legislature and its committees by providing
demographic data necessary for their activities;
6. To enforce the provisions of the Oklahoma State Government
Geographic Information One-Stop Initiative, created in Section
34.11.5 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to maintain a single
state clearinghouse for Geographic Information System (GIS) data;
7. To oversee and staff the 2030 Census Complete Count
Committee;


ENGR. H. B. NO. 3621 Page 2

8. To enforce the provisions of subsection E of Section 2840 of
Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes in order to facilitate the state's
participation in the Local Update of Census Addresses program;
9. To coordinate with the nonpartisan liaisons for the Census
Bureau Redistricting Data Program (RDO) to ensure participation in
all phases of the RDO program;
10. To coordinate with the state designee for the Census Bureau
Boundary and Annexation Survey to ensure alignment of jurisdictional
boundaries between state and federal government boundary databases;
11. To coordinate with the state designee for the School
District Review Program to assist in the review of school district
boundaries, codes, names, levels, and grade ranges, which are
critical to the state's allocation of federal education funding;
12. To work with state, local, and tribal stakeholders to
review and modify select statistical boundaries under the Census
Bureau Participant Statistical Areas Program; and
13. To establish an affiliate network of state, local, tribal,
nonprofit, and business leaders to share and promote data products,
releases, events, training, and other resources provided by the
Census Bureau.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.



ENGR. H. B. NO. 3621 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 3621 Page 4